Illinois, session 104th, HB3878.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $41,334,600, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 7Assistance Fund to the Board of Trustees of Chicago State 8University to meet its operational expenses for the fiscal 9year ending June 30, 2026. 10    Section 10. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Chicago State 12University Education Improvement Fund to the Board of Trustees 13of Chicago State University for any expenses incurred by the 14university. 15    Section 15. The sum of $307,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the General Professions 17Dedicated Fund to the Board of Trustees of Chicago State 18University for costs associated with the development, support 19or administration of pharmacy practice education or training 20programs.   HB3878- 2 -OMB104 00123 LAP 10123 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 22025.